Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1809.02
Nutrition counseling, defined.

Nutrition counseling means a supportive process, characterized by a collaborative counselor-patient or counselor-client relationship with individuals or groups, to establish food and nutrition priorities, goals, and individualized action plans and general physical activity guidance that acknowledge and foster responsibility for self-care to treat or manage an existing disease or medical condition or to promote health and wellness.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 35.